Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$248,351,580 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
expenditure of American Rescue Plan Act  Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys
collected or received by the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for payments to
eligible nonentitlement units of local government.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5547 (SB 5547-A) Page 1